Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.365

Food choice, physical activity, childhood fitness—Minimum standards—District waiver or exemption policy.

It is the goal of Washington state to ensure that:

(1) By 2010, all K-12 districts have school health advisory committees that advise school administration and school board members on policies, environmental changes, and programs needed to support healthy food choice and physical activity and childhood fitness. Districts shall include school nurses or other school personnel as advisory committee members.

(2) By 2010, only healthy food and beverages provided by schools during school hours or for school-sponsored activities shall be available on school campuses. Minimum standards for available food and beverages, except food served as part of a United States department of agriculture meal program, are:

(a) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total calories shall be from fat. This restriction does not apply to nuts, nut butters, seeds, eggs, fresh or dried fruits, vegetables that have not been deep-fried, legumes, reduced-fat cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy products, or low-fat dairy products;

(b) Not more than ten percent of its total calories shall be from saturated fat. This restriction does not apply to eggs, reduced-fat cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy products, or low-fat dairy products;

(c) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total weight or fifteen grams per food item shall be composed of sugar, including naturally occurring and added sugar. This restriction does not apply to the availability of fresh or dried fruits and vegetables that have not been deep-fried; and

(d) The standards for food and beverages in this subsection do not apply to:

(i) Low-fat and nonfat flavored milk with up to thirty grams of sugar per serving;

(ii) Nonfat or low-fat rice or soy beverages; or

(iii) One hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice.

(3) By 2010, all students in grades one through eight should have at least one hundred fifty minutes of quality physical education every week.

(4) By 2010, all student health and fitness instruction shall be conducted by appropriately certified instructors.

(5) Beginning with the 2011-2012 school year, any district waiver or exemption policy from physical education requirements for high school students should be based upon meeting both health and fitness curricula concepts as well as alternative means of engaging in physical activity, but should acknowledge students' interest in pursuing their academic interests.

[ 2007 c 5 s 5.]